algorithms/amharic.sbl
/*
 * Authors:
 * - Josiah Solomon, < yosiasz [at] gmail >
 *
*/

stringescapes { }

/* the Amharic letters in Unicode */
stringdef ha	'{U+1200}'	// ha
stringdef hu	'{U+1201}'	// hu
stringdef hi	'{U+1202}'	// hi
stringdef haa	'{U+1203}'	// haa
stringdef hee	'{U+1204}'	// hee
stringdef he	'{U+1205}'	// he
stringdef ho	'{U+1206}'	// ho
stringdef hoa	'{U+1207}'	// hoa
stringdef la	'{U+1208}'	// la
stringdef lu	'{U+1209}'	// lu
stringdef li	'{U+120A}'	// li
stringdef laa	'{U+120B}'	// laa
stringdef lee	'{U+120C}'	// lee
stringdef le	'{U+120D}'	// le
stringdef lo	'{U+120E}'	// lo
stringdef lwa	'{U+120F}'	// lwa
stringdef hha	'{U+1210}'	// hha
stringdef hhu	'{U+1211}'	// hhu
stringdef hhi	'{U+1212}'	// hhi
stringdef hhaa	'{U+1213}'	// hhaa
stringdef hhee	'{U+1214}'	// hhee
stringdef hhe	'{U+1215}'	// hhe
stringdef hho	'{U+1216}'	// hho
stringdef hhwa	'{U+1217}'	// hhwa
stringdef ma	'{U+1218}'	// ma
stringdef mu	'{U+1219}'	// mu
stringdef mi	'{U+121A}'	// mi
stringdef maa	'{U+121B}'	// maa
stringdef mee	'{U+121C}'	// mee
stringdef me	'{U+121D}'	// me
stringdef mo	'{U+121E}'	// mo
stringdef mwa	'{U+121F}'	// mwa
stringdef sza	'{U+1220}'	// sza
stringdef szu	'{U+1221}'	// szu
stringdef szi	'{U+1222}'	// szi
stringdef szaa	'{U+1223}'	// szaa
stringdef szee	'{U+1224}'	// szee
stringdef sze	'{U+1225}'	// sze
stringdef szo	'{U+1226}'	// szo
stringdef szwa	'{U+1227}'	// szwa
stringdef ra	'{U+1228}'	// ra
stringdef ru	'{U+1229}'	// ru
stringdef ri	'{U+122A}'	// ri
stringdef raa	'{U+122B}'	// raa
stringdef ree	'{U+122C}'	// ree
stringdef re	'{U+122D}'	// re
stringdef ro	'{U+122E}'	// ro
stringdef rwa	'{U+122F}'	// rwa
stringdef sa	'{U+1230}'	// sa
stringdef su	'{U+1231}'	// su
stringdef si	'{U+1232}'	// si
stringdef saa	'{U+1233}'	// saa
stringdef see	'{U+1234}'	// see
stringdef se	'{U+1235}'	// se
stringdef so	'{U+1236}'	// so
stringdef swa	'{U+1237}'	// swa
stringdef sha	'{U+1238}'	// sha
stringdef shu	'{U+1239}'	// shu
stringdef shi	'{U+123A}'	// shi
stringdef shaa	'{U+123B}'	// shaa
stringdef shee	'{U+123C}'	// shee
stringdef she	'{U+123D}'	// she
stringdef sho	'{U+123E}'	// sho
stringdef shwa	'{U+123F}'	// shwa
stringdef qa	'{U+1240}'	// qa
stringdef qu	'{U+1241}'	// qu
stringdef qi	'{U+1242}'	// qi
stringdef qaa	'{U+1243}'	// qaa
stringdef qee	'{U+1244}'	// qee
stringdef qe	'{U+1245}'	// qe
stringdef qo	'{U+1246}'	// qo
stringdef qoa	'{U+1247}'	// qoa
stringdef qwa	'{U+1248}'	// qwa
stringdef qwi	'{U+124A}'	// qwi
stringdef qwaa	'{U+124B}'	// qwaa
stringdef qwee	'{U+124C}'	// qwee
stringdef qwe	'{U+124D}'	// qwe
stringdef qha	'{U+1250}'	// qha
stringdef qhu	'{U+1251}'	// qhu
stringdef qhi	'{U+1252}'	// qhi
stringdef qhaa	'{U+1253}'	// qhaa
stringdef qhee	'{U+1254}'	// qhee
stringdef qhe	'{U+1255}'	// qhe
stringdef qho	'{U+1256}'	// qho
stringdef qhwa	'{U+1258}'	// qhwa
stringdef qhwi	'{U+125A}'	// qhwi
stringdef qhwaa	'{U+125B}'	// qhwaa
stringdef qhwee	'{U+125C}'	// qhwee
stringdef qhwe	'{U+125D}'	// qhwe
stringdef ba	'{U+1260}'	// ba
stringdef bu	'{U+1261}'	// bu
stringdef bi	'{U+1262}'	// bi
stringdef baa	'{U+1263}'	// baa
stringdef bee	'{U+1264}'	// bee
stringdef be	'{U+1265}'	// be
stringdef bo	'{U+1266}'	// bo
stringdef bwa	'{U+1267}'	// bwa
stringdef va	'{U+1268}'	// va
stringdef vu	'{U+1269}'	// vu
stringdef vi	'{U+126A}'	// vi
stringdef vaa	'{U+126B}'	// vaa
stringdef vee	'{U+126C}'	// vee
stringdef ve	'{U+126D}'	// ve
stringdef vo	'{U+126E}'	// vo
stringdef vwa	'{U+126F}'	// vwa
stringdef ta	'{U+1270}'	// ta
stringdef tu	'{U+1271}'	// tu
stringdef ti	'{U+1272}'	// ti
stringdef taa	'{U+1273}'	// taa
stringdef tee	'{U+1274}'	// tee
stringdef te	'{U+1275}'	// te
stringdef to	'{U+1276}'	// to
stringdef twa	'{U+1277}'	// twa
stringdef ca	'{U+1278}'	// ca
stringdef cu	'{U+1279}'	// cu
stringdef ci	'{U+127A}'	// ci
stringdef caa	'{U+127B}'	// caa
stringdef cee	'{U+127C}'	// cee
stringdef ce	'{U+127D}'	// ce
stringdef co	'{U+127E}'	// co
stringdef cwa	'{U+127F}'	// cwa
stringdef xa	'{U+1280}'	// xa
stringdef xu	'{U+1281}'	// xu
stringdef xi	'{U+1282}'	// xi
stringdef xaa	'{U+1283}'	// xaa
stringdef xee	'{U+1284}'	// xee
stringdef xe	'{U+1285}'	// xe
stringdef xo	'{U+1286}'	// xo
stringdef xoa	'{U+1287}'	// xoa
stringdef xwa	'{U+1288}'	// xwa
stringdef xwi	'{U+128A}'	// xwi
stringdef xwaa	'{U+128B}'	// xwaa
stringdef xwee	'{U+128C}'	// xwee
stringdef xwe	'{U+128D}'	// xwe
stringdef na	'{U+1290}'	// na
stringdef nu	'{U+1291}'	// nu
stringdef ni	'{U+1292}'	// ni
stringdef naa	'{U+1293}'	// naa
stringdef nee	'{U+1294}'	// nee
stringdef ne	'{U+1295}'	// ne
stringdef no	'{U+1296}'	// no
stringdef nwa	'{U+1297}'	// nwa
stringdef nya	'{U+1298}'	// nya
stringdef nyu	'{U+1299}'	// nyu
stringdef nyi	'{U+129A}'	// nyi
stringdef nyaa	'{U+129B}'	// nyaa
stringdef nyee	'{U+129C}'	// nyee
stringdef nye	'{U+129D}'	// nye
stringdef nyo	'{U+129E}'	// nyo
stringdef nywa	'{U+129F}'	// nywa
stringdef glottal a	'{U+12A0}'	// glottal a
stringdef glottal u	'{U+12A1}'	// glottal u
stringdef glottal i	'{U+12A2}'	// glottal i
stringdef glottal aa	'{U+12A3}'	// glottal aa
stringdef glottal ee	'{U+12A4}'	// glottal ee
stringdef glottal e	'{U+12A5}'	// glottal e
stringdef glottal o	'{U+12A6}'	// glottal o
stringdef glottal wa	'{U+12A7}'	// glottal wa
stringdef ka	'{U+12A8}'	// ka
stringdef ku	'{U+12A9}'	// ku
stringdef ki	'{U+12AA}'	// ki
stringdef kaa	'{U+12AB}'	// kaa
stringdef kee	'{U+12AC}'	// kee
stringdef ke	'{U+12AD}'	// ke
stringdef ko	'{U+12AE}'	// ko
stringdef koa	'{U+12AF}'	// koa
stringdef kwa	'{U+12B0}'	// kwa
stringdef kwi	'{U+12B2}'	// kwi
stringdef kwaa	'{U+12B3}'	// kwaa
stringdef kwee	'{U+12B4}'	// kwee
stringdef kwe	'{U+12B5}'	// kwe
stringdef kxa	'{U+12B8}'	// kxa
stringdef kxu	'{U+12B9}'	// kxu
stringdef kxi	'{U+12BA}'	// kxi
stringdef kxaa	'{U+12BB}'	// kxaa
stringdef kxee	'{U+12BC}'	// kxee
stringdef kxe	'{U+12BD}'	// kxe
stringdef kxo	'{U+12BE}'	// kxo
stringdef kxwa	'{U+12C0}'	// kxwa
stringdef kxwi	'{U+12C2}'	// kxwi
stringdef kxwaa	'{U+12C3}'	// kxwaa
stringdef kxwee	'{U+12C4}'	// kxwee
stringdef kxwe	'{U+12C5}'	// kxwe
stringdef wa	'{U+12C8}'	// wa
stringdef wu	'{U+12C9}'	// wu
stringdef wi	'{U+12CA}'	// wi
stringdef waa	'{U+12CB}'	// waa
stringdef wee	'{U+12CC}'	// wee
stringdef we	'{U+12CD}'	// we
stringdef wo	'{U+12CE}'	// wo
stringdef woa	'{U+12CF}'	// woa
stringdef pharyngeal a	'{U+12D0}'	// pharyngeal a
stringdef pharyngeal u	'{U+12D1}'	// pharyngeal u
stringdef pharyngeal i	'{U+12D2}'	// pharyngeal i
stringdef pharyngeal aa	'{U+12D3}'	// pharyngeal aa
stringdef pharyngeal ee	'{U+12D4}'	// pharyngeal ee
stringdef pharyngeal e	'{U+12D5}'	// pharyngeal e
stringdef pharyngeal o	'{U+12D6}'	// pharyngeal o
stringdef za	'{U+12D8}'	// za
stringdef zu	'{U+12D9}'	// zu
stringdef zi	'{U+12DA}'	// zi
stringdef zaa	'{U+12DB}'	// zaa
stringdef zee	'{U+12DC}'	// zee
stringdef ze	'{U+12DD}'	// ze
stringdef zo	'{U+12DE}'	// zo
stringdef zwa	'{U+12DF}'	// zwa
stringdef zha	'{U+12E0}'	// zha
stringdef zhu	'{U+12E1}'	// zhu
stringdef zhi	'{U+12E2}'	// zhi
stringdef zhaa	'{U+12E3}'	// zhaa
stringdef zhee	'{U+12E4}'	// zhee
stringdef zhe	'{U+12E5}'	// zhe
stringdef zho	'{U+12E6}'	// zho
stringdef zhwa	'{U+12E7}'	// zhwa
stringdef ya	'{U+12E8}'	// ya
stringdef yu	'{U+12E9}'	// yu
stringdef yi	'{U+12EA}'	// yi
stringdef yaa	'{U+12EB}'	// yaa
stringdef yee	'{U+12EC}'	// yee
stringdef ye	'{U+12ED}'	// ye
stringdef yo	'{U+12EE}'	// yo
stringdef yoa	'{U+12EF}'	// yoa
stringdef da	'{U+12F0}'	// da
stringdef du	'{U+12F1}'	// du
stringdef di	'{U+12F2}'	// di
stringdef daa	'{U+12F3}'	// daa
stringdef dee	'{U+12F4}'	// dee
stringdef de	'{U+12F5}'	// de
stringdef do	'{U+12F6}'	// do
stringdef dwa	'{U+12F7}'	// dwa
stringdef dda	'{U+12F8}'	// dda
stringdef ddu	'{U+12F9}'	// ddu
stringdef ddi	'{U+12FA}'	// ddi
stringdef ddaa	'{U+12FB}'	// ddaa
stringdef ddee	'{U+12FC}'	// ddee
stringdef dde	'{U+12FD}'	// dde
stringdef ddo	'{U+12FE}'	// ddo
stringdef ddwa	'{U+12FF}'	// ddwa
stringdef ja	'{U+1300}'	// ja
stringdef ju	'{U+1301}'	// ju
stringdef ji	'{U+1302}'	// ji
stringdef jaa	'{U+1303}'	// jaa
stringdef jee	'{U+1304}'	// jee
stringdef je	'{U+1305}'	// je
stringdef jo	'{U+1306}'	// jo
stringdef jwa	'{U+1307}'	// jwa
stringdef ga	'{U+1308}'	// ga
stringdef gu	'{U+1309}'	// gu
stringdef gi	'{U+130A}'	// gi
stringdef gaa	'{U+130B}'	// gaa
stringdef gee	'{U+130C}'	// gee
stringdef ge	'{U+130D}'	// ge
stringdef go	'{U+130E}'	// go
stringdef goa	'{U+130F}'	// goa
stringdef gwa	'{U+1310}'	// gwa
stringdef gwi	'{U+1312}'	// gwi
stringdef gwaa	'{U+1313}'	// gwaa
stringdef gwee	'{U+1314}'	// gwee
stringdef gwe	'{U+1315}'	// gwe
stringdef gga	'{U+1318}'	// gga
stringdef ggu	'{U+1319}'	// ggu
stringdef ggi	'{U+131A}'	// ggi
stringdef ggaa	'{U+131B}'	// ggaa
stringdef ggee	'{U+131C}'	// ggee
stringdef gge	'{U+131D}'	// gge
stringdef ggo	'{U+131E}'	// ggo
stringdef ggwaa	'{U+131F}'	// ggwaa
stringdef tha	'{U+1320}'	// tha
stringdef thu	'{U+1321}'	// thu
stringdef thi	'{U+1322}'	// thi
stringdef thaa	'{U+1323}'	// thaa
stringdef thee	'{U+1324}'	// thee
stringdef the	'{U+1325}'	// the
stringdef tho	'{U+1326}'	// tho
stringdef thwa	'{U+1327}'	// thwa
stringdef cha	'{U+1328}'	// cha
stringdef chu	'{U+1329}'	// chu
stringdef chi	'{U+132A}'	// chi
stringdef chaa	'{U+132B}'	// chaa
stringdef chee	'{U+132C}'	// chee
stringdef che	'{U+132D}'	// che
stringdef cho	'{U+132E}'	// cho
stringdef chwa	'{U+132F}'	// chwa
stringdef pha	'{U+1330}'	// pha
stringdef phu	'{U+1331}'	// phu
stringdef phi	'{U+1332}'	// phi
stringdef phaa	'{U+1333}'	// phaa
stringdef phee	'{U+1334}'	// phee
stringdef phe	'{U+1335}'	// phe
stringdef pho	'{U+1336}'	// pho
stringdef phwa	'{U+1337}'	// phwa
stringdef tsa	'{U+1338}'	// tsa
stringdef tsu	'{U+1339}'	// tsu
stringdef tsi	'{U+133A}'	// tsi
stringdef tsaa	'{U+133B}'	// tsaa
stringdef tsee	'{U+133C}'	// tsee
stringdef tse	'{U+133D}'	// tse
stringdef tso	'{U+133E}'	// tso
stringdef tswa	'{U+133F}'	// tswa
stringdef tza	'{U+1340}'	// tza
stringdef tzu	'{U+1341}'	// tzu
stringdef tzi	'{U+1342}'	// tzi
stringdef tzaa	'{U+1343}'	// tzaa
stringdef tzee	'{U+1344}'	// tzee
stringdef tze	'{U+1345}'	// tze
stringdef tzo	'{U+1346}'	// tzo
stringdef tzoa	'{U+1347}'	// tzoa
stringdef fa	'{U+1348}'	// fa
stringdef fu	'{U+1349}'	// fu
stringdef fi	'{U+134A}'	// fi
stringdef faa	'{U+134B}'	// faa
stringdef fee	'{U+134C}'	// fee
stringdef fe	'{U+134D}'	// fe
stringdef fo	'{U+134E}'	// fo
stringdef fwa	'{U+134F}'	// fwa
stringdef pa	'{U+1350}'	// pa
stringdef pu	'{U+1351}'	// pu
stringdef pi	'{U+1352}'	// pi
stringdef paa	'{U+1353}'	// paa
stringdef pee	'{U+1354}'	// pee
stringdef pe	'{U+1355}'	// pe
stringdef po	'{U+1356}'	// po
stringdef pwa	'{U+1357}'	// pwa
stringdef rya	'{U+1358}'	// rya
stringdef mya	'{U+1359}'	// mya
stringdef fya	'{U+135A}'	// fya
stringdef 01	'{U+1369}'	
stringdef 02	'{U+136A}'	
stringdef 03	'{U+136B}'	
stringdef 04	'{U+136C}'	
stringdef 05	'{U+136D}'	
stringdef 06	'{U+136E}'	
stringdef 07	'{U+136F}'	
stringdef 08	'{U+1370}'	
stringdef 09	'{U+1371}'	
stringdef 10	'{U+1372}'	
stringdef 20	'{U+1373}'	
stringdef 30	'{U+1374}'	
stringdef 40	'{U+1375}'	
stringdef 50	'{U+1376}'	
stringdef 60	'{U+1377}'	
stringdef 70	'{U+1378}'	
stringdef 80	'{U+1379}'	
stringdef 90	'{U+137A}'	
stringdef 100	'{U+137B}'	
stringdef 10000	'{U+137C}'	

booleans (
            is_noun
            is_verb
            is_defined
         )

routines (
    Prefix_Step1
    Prefix_Step2
    Prefix_Step3a_Noun
    Prefix_Step3b_Noun
    Prefix_Step3_Verb
    Prefix_Step4_Verb

    Suffix_All_alef_maqsura
    Suffix_Noun_Step1a
    Suffix_Noun_Step1b
    Suffix_Noun_Step2a
    Suffix_Noun_Step2b
    Suffix_Noun_Step2c1
    Suffix_Noun_Step2c2
    Suffix_Noun_Step3
    Suffix_Verb_Step1
    Suffix_Verb_Step2a
    Suffix_Verb_Step2b
    Suffix_Verb_Step2c

    Normalize_post
    Normalize_pre

    Checks1
)

externals ( stem )

groupings (  )
